Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.200

Public depositary pool—Uniform treatment by commission.

For the purposes of this chapter, the commission shall include all public depositaries in a single public depositary pool. All public depositaries, as defined in RCW 39.58.010, shall be treated uniformly by the commission without regard to distinctions in the nature of its financial institution charter.

[ 2009 c 9 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.